Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202386-1506
Commission; prohibited acts.

In carrying out the Rural Communications Sustainability Act, the commission shall not:

(1) Require a competitive provider to accept or receive support from the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund;

(2) Impose eligible telecommunications carrier responsibilities or carrier of last resort obligations relating to the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act on a competitive provider in any deployment project area where the incumbent carrier or competitive provider is not actually receiving support from the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund; or

(3) Impose eligible telecommunications carrier responsibilities or carrier of last resort obligations on an incumbent carrier that are not in existence as of the date of final payment made pursuant to section 86-1505.

Laws 2023, LB683, § 17.
May 27, 2023